Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky all-payer claims database is established in Sections 1 to 6 of this
Act to effectuate the following purposes:
(a) Allow for targeted population health initiatives;
(b) Determine state health status needs;
(c) Inform state health care planning;
(d) Support research in the areas of health care cost, quality, and accessibility;
(e) Improve the accessibility, adequacy, and affordability of health care and
health care coverage through the review and dissemination of data;
(f) Review health care costs among various treatment settings, providers, and
modalities;
(g) Evaluate the effectiveness of health care programs and services to improve
patient outcomes; and
(h) Support the development of quality improvement initiatives.
(2) Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall not be construed to supersede, supplement, or
limit the provisions of KRS Chapter 216B relating to certificates of need.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Office of Data Analytics
created in Section 8 of this Act;
(2) "Health care claims":
(a) Means claims made for the payment or reimbursement of the following
types of health care services:
Page 1 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
1. Medical and hospital, which includes without limitation surgical,
mental health, substance use disorder, nursing, rehabilitative and
habilitative services, and laboratory services;
2. Dental;
3. Pharmacy; and
4. Any other health care service designated by the executive director in
an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A; and
(b) Does not include claims made to a primary care provider for the provision
of primary care services under a direct primary care membership agreement
established under KRS 311.6201, 311.6202, 314.198, or 314.199;
(3) (a) "Health payer" means any person that pays, or administers the payment of,
health care claims.
(b) As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection, "person" includes but is not
limited to:
1. Medicare;
2. Medicaid;
3. The Kentucky Children's Health Insurance Program;
4. Workers' compensation insurers, including governmental and
nongovernmental workers' compensation self-insurers and self-
insured groups;
5. Insurers, self-insurers, and self-insured groups, including
governmental and nongovernmental self-insured employers, self-
insured health plans, and self-insured employer-organized
associations, that provide:
a. Coverage for health care services;
b. Health care benefits; or
Page 2 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
c. Any kind of insurance regulated under KRS Chapter 304;
6. Health maintenance organizations;
7. Limited health service organizations;
8. Provider-sponsored integrated health delivery networks;
9. Nonprofit hospital, medical-surgical, dental, and health service
corporations;
10. Administrators, as defined in KRS 304.9-051;
11. Pharmacy benefit managers;
12. Any third-party payor that is not exempt by federal law from
regulation under the insurance laws of this state;
13. Any person that contracts with a state or federal agency to provide
coverage for health care services; and
14. Any vendor or contractor of a person listed in this paragraph; and
(4) "Kentucky all-payer claims database" means the all-payer claims database
established in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky all-payer claims database fund is hereby established as a restricted
fund in the State Treasury.
(2) The following shall be deposited into the fund:
(a) All grants and funds received or raised under Section 4 of this Act;
(b) Any fees collected under Section 6 of this Act;
(c) Any penalties collected under Section 10 of this Act; and
(d) Any appropriations made to the fund by the General Assembly.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the fund not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(4) Moneys in the fund shall be available to the executive director to develop,
Page 3 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
implement, operate, and maintain the Kentucky all-payer claims database.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The executive director shall develop, implement, operate, and maintain the
Kentucky all-payer claims database in accordance with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(2) In carrying out the duties under subsection (1) of this section, the executive
director:
(a) Shall make good-faith efforts to:
1. Seek and accept grants, or raise funds, from any available source,
public or private, to support the development, implementation,
operation, and maintenance of the database; and
2. Establish agreements:
a. For voluntary reporting of health care claims data from health
payers that are not subject to mandatory reporting requirements.
If feasible, the executive director shall implement the reporting
format for self-insured group health plans described in 29 U.S.C.
sec. 1191d, as amended;
b. With the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
obtain Medicare health care claims data; and
c. With all-payer claims databases in other states to establish a
single application for access to data by authorized users across
multiple states, if the executive director determines that the
agreements are feasible and beneficial for the operation of the
Kentucky all-payer claims database;
(b) Shall:
1. Determine the measures necessary to implement reporting
requirements in a manner that:
Page 4 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
a. Is cost effective and reasonable for data sources;
b. Is timely, relevant, and reliable for data users;
c. Eliminates, or reduces to the greatest extent practicable, the
submission of duplicate or redundant health care claims data;
and
d. Does not violate any applicable laws;
2. Establish policies and procedures necessary for the administration
and oversight of the database, including all necessary communication,
coordination, and data sharing with the commissioner of insurance
for enforcement under Section 10 of this Act;
3. Ensure the integrity, privacy, and security of personal health
information and other proprietary information related to the collection
and release of data;
4. Ensure that the database is operated in compliance with all state and
federal law, including but not limited to:
a. The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as amended, and any related
federal regulations, as amended;
b. 42 U.S.C. sec. 290dd-2, as amended, and any related federal
regulations, as amended, including but not limited to 42 C.F.R.
pt. 2; and
c. All other applicable state and federal data privacy and security
laws relating to the collection, storage, and release of data,
except that the provisions of this section and Section 6 of this Act
shall control over any conflicting state laws; and
5. Promulgate any administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A that are necessary to carry out Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
Page 5 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
and
(c) May:
1. a. Audit any data required to be submitted under Section 6 of this
Act as needed to corroborate the accuracy of submitted data.
b. Any audit conducted under this subparagraph shall, to the extent
practicable, be coordinated with other audits or examinations
performed by state or federal agencies;
2. a. Contract with one (1) or more qualified third parties:
i. To collect or process health care claims data; or
ii. For any other expertise, service, or function necessary to
carry out the provisions of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
b. The authority granted under this subparagraph shall include
without limitation designating a qualified third party to
implement, operate, and maintain the Kentucky all-payer claims
database; and
3. Share and receive data or other information, including confidential
and proprietary data or information, with and from state agencies,
federal agencies, and all-payer claims databases in other states if:
a. The recipient agrees in a written or electronic record to maintain
any confidential or proprietary status afforded to the data or
information; and
b. The data or information is shared or received in a manner that
does not violate any applicable laws.
(3) If the executive director contracts with a third-party under subsection (2)(c)2. of
this section, the executive director shall monitor and supervise the third party to
ensure that the third party complies with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(4) A third party that contracts with the executive director under subsection (2)(c)2.
Page 6 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
of this section shall not release, publish, or otherwise use any information to
which the third party has access under the contract without express permission in
a written or electronic record from the executive director.
(5) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in data or
information shall not occur as a result of a disclosure made under this section.
(6) (a) With regard to the Kentucky all-payer claims database, the executive
director shall, by September 1 of each year, file a written report with the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission, for referral to the
appropriate interim joint committees or other appropriate committees, that
details the following:
1. The status of any development efforts, including efforts to obtain
funding for the database;
2. A detailed summary of database operations for the previous year;
3. The financial stability of the database;
4. An assessment of:
a. The cost, performance, and effectiveness of the database;
b. The performance of any third parties designated by the executive
director under subsection (2)(c)2. of this section; and
c. Whether the database has advanced the purposes set forth in
Section 1 of this Act; and
5. Any recommendations for database changes or improvements,
including statutory changes.
(b) In completing the determination required under paragraph (a)4.c. of this
subsection, the executive director shall, to the extent it is available, utilize
economic expertise.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 7 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
(1) There is hereby established the Kentucky All-Payer Claims Database Advisory
Council, whose duties shall be to make recommendations to the executive director
as to the development, implementation, operation, and maintenance of the
database.
(2) (a) The council shall consist of the following individual members:
1. A member of academia with experience in health care data research;
2. A representative from the Kentucky Hospital Association;
3. A representative from the Kentucky Medical Association;
4. A representative from the Kentucky Pharmacists Association;
5. A representative from the Kentucky Dental Association;
6. A representative from the Kentucky Primary Care Association;
7. A representative from a Medicaid managed care organization or an
organization that represents Medicaid managed care organizations;
8. A representative from a health insurer that offers health insurance
coverage in the private market or an organization that represents such
health insurers;
9. A representative from an employer that provides self-insured group
health insurance coverage to its employees;
10. A representative from a property and casualty insurer or an
organization that represents property and casualty insurers;
11. A representative from a workers' compensation insurer, self-insurer,
or self-insured group;
12. A person that advocates on behalf of, or promotes the interests of,
health care consumers; and
13. A person with expertise or experience in health care data collection or
storage.
(b) In addition to the members listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Page 8 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
following persons, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio members of
the council:
1. The commissioner of the Department of Insurance;
2. The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology;
3. The commissioner of the Department of Employee Insurance;
4. The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services;
5. The commissioner of the Department for Public Health; and
6. The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.
(c) The council shall include the following nonvoting ex officio members:
1. The executive director, who shall serve as chair of the council; and
2. A representative of the Office of Application Technology Services.
(d) The members listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Be appointed by the Governor; and
2. Serve a term of three (3) years.
(e) 1. The Governor shall fill all vacancies under paragraph (a) of this
subsection within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
2. In the event a representative or person referenced in paragraph (a) of
this subsection is not available or willing to serve, the Governor shall
appoint a person with expertise or experience in the applicable
referenced industry or subject matter.
(3) The council's recommendations shall include but not be limited to
recommendations that:
(a) Provide specific strategies for measuring and collecting data related to
health care safety, quality, utilization, health outcomes, and cost;
(b) Focus on data elements that foster quality improvement and peer group
comparisons;
Page 9 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
(c) Facilitate value-based, cost-effective purchasing of health care services by
public and private purchasers and consumers;
(d) Result in usable and comparable information that allows public and private
health care purchasers, consumers, and data analysts to identify and
compare health plans, health payers, health care facilities, and health care
providers regarding the provision of safe, cost-effective, and high-quality
health care services;
(e) Use and build upon existing data collection standards and methods that
establish and maintain the database in a cost-effective and efficient manner,
which includes incorporating and utilizing uniform data collection that
aligns, where possible, with national or federal uniform all-payer claims
database standards;
(f) Incorporate and utilize claims, eligibility, and other publicly available data
to the extent it is the most cost-effective method of collecting data to
minimize the cost and administrative burden on data sources;
(g) Address whether publicly available data, in addition to the data submitted by
health payers, should be included to measure or analyze health care quality,
safety, or cost issues, including data on the uninsured;
(h) Address the use of a master person identification process to enable
matching members across health plans;
(i) Ensure the integrity, privacy, and security of personal health information
and other proprietary information related to the collection and release of
data, including compliance with all state and federal laws as required under
subsection (2)(b) of Section 4 of this Act;
(j) Address ongoing oversight of database operations; and
(k) Address the feasibility and advisability of working with all-payer claims
databases in other states to establish a single application for access to data
Page 10 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
by authorized users across multiple states.
(4) The first meeting of the council shall take place within thirty (30) days of
appointment of all the members listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(5) (a) The council shall meet upon the call of the executive director, but not less
than quarterly for the first two (2) years after the date of the first council
meeting. Thereafter, the council shall meet not less than semiannually.
(b) A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum to do business.
(c) Recommendations of the council shall require a:
1. Quorum; and
2. Majority of the voting members present.
(d) A member shall be permitted to participate and vote in council business
through distance communication technology.
(6) The council shall be a budgetary unit of the cabinet, which shall:
(a) Pay the council's necessary operating expenses; and
(b) Furnish all office space, personnel, equipment, supplies, and technical or
administrative services required by the council in the performance of the
functions established in this section.
(7) Members of the council listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section shall receive no
compensation for services, but shall receive actual and necessary travel expenses
associated with attending meetings in accordance with state administrative
regulations relating to travel reimbursement.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) To the extent permitted under federal law, health payers shall submit data
relating to health care claims to the executive director, or a third party designated
by the executive director, beginning not later than the last of the following to
occur:
Page 11 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
(a) Three (3) months after the Kentucky all-payer claims database becomes
fully operational; or
(b) The date the person begins to do business, operate, or otherwise engage in
activity in Kentucky.
(2) (a) The executive director shall establish the following by administrative
regulation:
1. The data elements to be collected, the reporting format, and the
frequency of submissions under subsection (1) of this section;
2. The data available to data users under subsection (5) of this section,
including:
a. The manner in which the data will be made available; and
b. The process for accessing, requesting, and making the data
available; and
3. Data access fees, which shall be deposited into the fund established in
Section 3 of this Act.
(b) In carrying out the requirements of this subsection, the executive director
may require data users to enter into data service agreements or memoranda
of understanding.
(3) To the extent permitted under federal law, any health payer not required to
comply with this section under state or federal law may opt to submit data under
this section.
(4) All state and local government health plans or programs regulated, created, or
authorized under Kentucky law, including any insurers or administrators
offering or administering those plans or programs, shall comply with the data
submission requirements of this section, including without limitation:
(a) Any plan or program offered or administered under KRS Chapter 205; and
(b) Any governmental plan, as defined in 29 U.S.C. sec. 1002, including any
Page 12 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
plan offered to the Public Employee Health Insurance Program for public
employees under KRS 18A.225 or 18A.2254.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Kentucky all-payer claims
database shall:
(a) Be available to provide data to:
1. Health payers, consumers, employers, health care facilities, health
care providers, purchasers of health care, and state agencies, in a
form and manner that ensures the privacy and security of personal
health information as required by state and federal law, for the
purpose of allowing continuous review of health care utilization,
expenditures, quality, and safety; and
2. A state agency or other public or private entity for the purpose of
supporting the agency's or entity's demonstrated efforts to improve or
benefit the health care system through research and analysis, subject
to administrative regulations promulgated by the executive director;
and
(b) Present data in a manner that:
1. Allows for comparisons of:
a. Geographic, demographic, and economic factors; and
b. Institutional size; and
2. Is consumer-friendly.
(6) (a) To the extent permitted under federal law, a health payer shall not be
required to obtain any individual's consent or permission in order to submit
the individual's data in accordance with this section.
(b) Compliance with the requirements of this section shall not be deemed a
violation of data or consumer privacy laws or any other laws.
(7) Except as provided in Section 4 of this Act and subsection (8) of this section, the
Page 13 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
Kentucky all-payer claims database shall not disclose any data that:
(a) Could be used to identify an individual;
(b) Is determined by the executive director to be incomplete, preliminary,
substantially in error, or not representative; or
(c) Could, due to small sample size or other factors, reveal the identity of an
individual or produce misleading information.
(8) (a) The executive director may require health payers to submit or use direct
identifying information about individuals for the purpose of assigning a
unique patient identifier.
(b) Upon the assignment of a unique patient identifier, all direct identifying
information about the individual shall be stripped from any data collected,
and not be retained, by the executive director or any third party designated
by the executive director.
(9) (a) A person shall not access, request, receive, or use any data or information
disclosed under subsection (5) of this section:
1. To obtain or disclose trade secrets;
2. To reidentify or attempt to reidentify an individual's data or
information;
3. To sell the data or information;
4. To distribute the data or information for commercial purposes;
5. To take any action in violation of any applicable data privacy or
security laws; or
6. For any purpose not identified in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) A person shall not access or receive data from the Kentucky all-payer
claims database unless the person agrees in a written or electronic record to
comply with this subsection.
(10) All information and data acquired by the executive director or a third party
Page 14 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
designated by the executive director under this section shall:
(a) Be disclosed only to the extent provided in Section 4 of this Act and this
section; and
(b) Not be subject to disclosure under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
Section 7. KRS 194A.030 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet consists of the following major organizational units, which are hereby
created:
(1) Office of the Secretary. Within the Office of the Secretary, there shall be an Office
of Legal Services, an Office of Inspector General, an Office of Public Affairs, an
Office of Human Resource Management, an Office of Finance and Budget, an
Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs, an Office of Administrative Services,
an Office of Application Technology Services, an Office of Data Analytics, and an
Office of Medical Cannabis as follows:
(a) The Office of Legal Services shall provide legal advice and assistance to all
units of the cabinet in any legal action in which it may be involved. The
Office of Legal Services shall employ all attorneys of the cabinet who serve
the cabinet in the capacity of attorney, giving legal advice and opinions
concerning the operation of all programs in the cabinet. The Office of Legal
Services shall be headed by a general counsel who shall be appointed by the
secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050 and 12.210.
The general counsel shall be the chief legal advisor to the secretary and shall
be directly responsible to the secretary. The Attorney General, on the request
of the secretary, may designate the general counsel as an assistant attorney
general under the provisions of KRS 15.105;
(b) The Office of Inspector General shall be headed by an inspector general who
shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor. The
inspector general shall be directly responsible to the secretary. The Office of
Page 15 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
Inspector General shall be responsible for:
1. The conduct of audits and investigations for detecting the perpetration of
fraud or abuse of any program by any client, or by any vendor of
services with whom the cabinet has contracted; and the conduct of
special investigations requested by the secretary, commissioners, or
office heads of the cabinet into matters related to the cabinet or its
programs;
2. Licensing and regulatory functions as the secretary may delegate;
3. Review of health facilities participating in transplant programs, as
determined by the secretary, for the purpose of determining any
violations of KRS 311.1911 to 311.1959, 311.1961, and 311.1963;
4. The duties, responsibilities, and authority pertaining to the certificate of
need functions and the licensure appeals functions, pursuant to KRS
Chapter 216B;
5. The notification and forwarding of any information relevant to possible
criminal violations to the appropriate prosecuting authority;
6. The oversight of the operations of the Kentucky Health Information
Exchange; and
7. The support and guidance to health care providers related to telehealth
services, including the development of policy, standards, resources, and
education to expand telehealth services across the Commonwealth;
(c) The Office of Public Affairs shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance
with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide information to the public and news
media about the programs, services, and initiatives of the cabinet;
(d) The Office of Human Resource Management shall be headed by an executive
director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in
Page 16 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall coordinate, oversee, and
execute all personnel, training, and management functions of the cabinet. The
office shall focus on the oversight, development, and implementation of
quality improvement services; curriculum development and delivery of
instruction to staff; the administration, management, and oversight of training
operations; health, safety, and compliance training; and equal employment
opportunity compliance functions;
(e) The Office of Finance and Budget shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance
with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central review and oversight of
budget, contract, and cabinet finances. The office shall provide coordination,
assistance, and support to program departments and independent review and
analysis on behalf of the secretary;
(f) The Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs shall be headed by an
executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central
review and oversight of legislation, policy, and administrative regulations.
The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program
departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary;
(g) The Office of Administrative Services shall be headed by an executive
director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in
accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central review and
oversight of procurement, general accounting including grant monitoring, and
facility management. The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and
support to program departments and independent review and analysis on
behalf of the secretary;
(h) The Office of Application Technology Services shall be headed by an
Page 17 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide
application technology services including central review and oversight. The
office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program
departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary;
(i) The Office of Data Analytics shall be headed by an executive director who
shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under
KRS 12.050, and shall:
1. Identify and innovate strategic initiatives to inform public policy
initiatives and provide opportunities for improved health outcomes for
all Kentuckians though data analytics;[. The office shall]
2. Provide leadership in the redesign of the health care delivery system
using electronic information technology to improve patient care and
reduce medical errors and duplicative services; and
3. Develop, implement, operate, and maintain the Kentucky all-payer
claims database in accordance with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act; and
(j) The Office of Medical Cannabis shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040 and shall
implement, operate, oversee, and regulate the medicinal cannabis program.
The office shall be composed of the Division of Enforcement and Compliance
and the Division of Licensure and Access. Each division in the office shall be
headed by a director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050.
(2) Department for Medicaid Services. The Department for Medicaid Services shall
serve as the single state agency in the Commonwealth to administer Title XIX of
the Federal Social Security Act. The Department for Medicaid Services shall be
headed by a commissioner for Medicaid services, who shall be appointed by the
Page 18 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner
for Medicaid services shall be a person who by experience and training in
administration and management is qualified to perform the duties of this office. The
commissioner for Medicaid services shall exercise authority over the Department
for Medicaid Services under the direction of the secretary and shall only fulfill
those responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;
(3) Department for Public Health. The Department for Public Health shall develop and
operate all programs of the cabinet that provide health services and all programs for
assessing the health status of the population for the promotion of health and the
prevention of disease, injury, disability, and premature death. This shall include but
not be limited to oversight of the Division of Women's Health and the Office for
Children with Special Health Care Needs. The duties, responsibilities, and authority
set out in KRS 200.460 to 200.490 shall be performed by the Department for Public
Health. The Department for Public Health shall advocate for the rights of children
with disabilities and, to the extent that funds are available, shall ensure the
administration of services for children with disabilities as are deemed appropriate
by this office pursuant to Title V of the Social Security Act. The Department for
Public Health may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A
as may be necessary to implement and administer its responsibilities. The Office for
Children with Special Health Care Needs may be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with
KRS 12.050. The Department for Public Health shall be headed by a commissioner
for public health who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for public health shall be a duly
licensed physician who by experience and training in administration and
management is qualified to perform the duties of this office. The commissioner
shall advise the head of each major organizational unit enumerated in this section
Page 19 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
on policies, plans, and programs relating to all matters of public health, including
any actions necessary to safeguard the health of the citizens of the Commonwealth.
The commissioner shall serve as chief medical officer of the Commonwealth. The
commissioner for public health shall exercise authority over the Department for
Public Health under the direction of the secretary and shall only fulfill those
responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;
(4) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities. The
Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall
develop and administer programs for the prevention of mental illness, intellectual
disabilities, brain injury, developmental disabilities, and substance use disorders
and shall develop and administer an array of services and support for the treatment,
habilitation, and rehabilitation of persons who have a mental illness or emotional
disability, or who have an intellectual disability, brain injury, developmental
disability, or a substance use disorder. The Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall be headed by a commissioner for
behavioral health, developmental and intellectual disabilities who shall be
appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050.
The commissioner for behavioral health, developmental and intellectual disabilities
shall be by training and experience in administration and management qualified to
perform the duties of the office. The commissioner for behavioral health,
developmental and intellectual disabilities shall exercise authority over the
department under the direction of the secretary, and shall only fulfill those
responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;
(5) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services. The Department
for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services shall streamline the various
responsibilities associated with the human services programs for which the cabinet
is responsible. This shall include, but not be limited to, oversight of the Division of
Page 20 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
Family Resource and Youth Services Centers and Serve Kentucky. The Department
for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services shall be headed by a
commissioner who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for family resource centers and
volunteer services shall be by training and experience in administration and
management qualified to perform the duties of the office, shall exercise authority
over the department under the direction of the secretary, and shall only fulfill those
responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;
(6) Department for Community Based Services. The Department for Community Based
Services shall administer and be responsible for child and adult protection,
guardianship services, violence prevention resources, foster care and adoption,
permanency, and services to enhance family self-sufficiency, including child care,
social services, public assistance, and family support. The department shall be
headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050; and
(7) Department for Aging and Independent Living. The Department for Aging and
Independent Living shall serve as the state unit as designated by the Administration
on Aging Services under the Older Americans Act and shall have responsibility for
administration of the federal community support services, in-home services, meals,
family and caregiver support services, elder rights and legal assistance, senior
community services employment program, the state health insurance assistance
program, state home and community based services including home care,
Alzheimer's respite services and the personal care attendant program, certifications
of assisted living facilities, and the state Council on Alzheimer's Disease and other
related disorders. The department shall also administer the Long-Term Care
Ombudsman Program and the Medicaid Home and Community Based Waivers
Participant Directed Services Option (PDS) Program. The department shall serve as
Page 21 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
the information and assistance center for aging and disability services and
administer multiple federal grants and other state initiatives. The department shall
be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050.
Section 8. KRS 194A.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Data Analytics is hereby created in the Office of the Secretary. The
office shall:
(a) Provide oversight and strategic direction for, and be responsible for the
coordinating of, the data analysis initiatives of[for] the various departments
that regulate health care and social services to ensure that policy is consistent
with the long-term goals across the Commonwealth; and
(b) Develop, implement, operate, and maintain the Kentucky all-payer claims
database in accordance with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(2) The office shall have the authority to review all data requests received by the
cabinet from the public, review the requests for content to determine the cabinet's
response, and approve the release of the requested information. The office shall
review data analyses conducted by the departments within the cabinet to ensure the
consistency, quality, and validity of the analysis prior to its use in operational and
policy decisions. The office shall facilitate the process of data integration by
initiating and maintaining data-sharing agreements in order to improve inter-agency
and cross-cabinet collaboration.
(3) The Office of Data Analytics shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Section 9. KRS 304.2-100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall personally supervise the operations of the department.
(2) The commissioner shall examine and inquire into violations of this code, shall
enforce the provisions of this code with impartiality and shall execute the duties
Page 22 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
imposed upon him or her by this code.
(3) The commissioner shall have the powers and authority expressly conferred upon
him or her by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this code.
(4) The commissioner may conduct such examinations and investigations of insurance
matters, in addition to examinations and investigations expressly authorized, as the
commissioner may deem proper upon reasonable and probable cause to determine
whether any person has violated any provisions of this code or to secure
information useful in the lawful administration of any such provision. The cost of
such additional examinations and investigations shall be borne by the state.
(5) The commissioner may establish and maintain such branch offices in this state as
may be reasonably required for the efficient administration of this code.
(6) The commissioner shall have such additional powers and duties as may be provided
by other laws of this state.
(7) The commissioner shall assist the Office of[ Health] Data[ and] Analytics in
carrying out Subtitle 17B of this chapter,[ and] KRS 194A.099, and Sections 1 to 6
of this Act.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 99 OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The commissioner shall enforce the reporting requirements for health
payers under Section 6 of this Act.
(b) In carrying out the duties under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
commissioner:
1. May assess a civil penalty in accordance with this section; and
2. Shall have the authority, powers, and duties set forth in Subtitle 2 of
this chapter for violations of this code, including the requirements for
orders, notices, and hearings.
(2) (a) Subject to paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, the
Page 23 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
commissioner shall promulgate an administrative regulation designating a
schedule of penalties, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day,
for any health payer that fails to comply with the reporting requirements for
that person under Section 6 of this Act.
(b) Local government, state, and federal agencies shall not be assessed or
subject to a penalty under this subsection.
(c) The commissioner may, by administrative regulation, adjust the maximum
penalty established under paragraph (a) of this subsection every two (2)
years based on the percent change in the nonseasonally adjusted annual
average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City
Average, Medical Care, between the two (2) most recent calendar years
available, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(d) The commissioner shall promulgate an administrative regulation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A designating the process for notice,
hearing, and collection of any penalty assessed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(e) The commissioner may, upon such terms and conditions that are
determined by the commissioner to be in the public interest, remit or
mitigate any penalty assessed under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) Any penalties collected by the department under this section shall be deposited
into the Kentucky all-payer claims database fund established in Section 3 of this
Act.
(4) The commissioner may promulgate any additional administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement or aid in the
effectuation of this section.
Section 11. (1) The Governor shall make all initial appointments under
subsection (2)(a) of Section 5 of this Act within 90 days of the effective date of this Act.
Page 24 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1392
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(d)2. of Section 5 of this Act, initial
appointments under subsection (2)(a) of Section 5 of this Act shall be staggered so that,
of the initial 13 appointments:
(a) Five of the appointments expire four years after the initial appointment;
(b) Four of the appointments expire three years after the initial appointment; and
(c) Four of the appointments expire two years after the initial appointment.
Section 12. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 6 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 6 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 6 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 13. Sections 6 and 12 of this Act constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 25 of 25
XXXX 1/12/2026 8:04 AM Jacketed